test/src/morphology/V-keeratw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kēratõ: # Verb 53 'eng /est kirjutada/fin' - full paradigm
     kēratõ+V+Inf: kēratõ
     kēratõ+V+Ger: kēratõs
     kēratõ+V+Sup: kēratõm
     kēratõ+V+Sup+Ine: kēratõmõs
     kēratõ+V+Sup+Ela: kēratõmõst
     kēratõ+V+Sup+Tra: kēratõmõks
     kēratõ+V+Sup+Abe: kēratõmõt
     kēratõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kēratõb
     kēratõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kēratõt
     kēratõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kēratõbõd
     kēratõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kēratiz
     kēratõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kēratizt, kēratiztõ]
     kēratõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kēratizt, kēratiztõ]
     kēratõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kērat
     kēratõ+V+Cond+Sg3: kēratõks
     kēratõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kērat
     kēratõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: kērat
     kēratõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kēratõgid
     kēratõ+V+Jus+Sg3: kēratõg
     kēratõ+V+Quo+Sg3: kēratiji
     kēratõ+V+ActPrfPrc: kēratõn
     kēratõ+V+PssPrfPrc: kēratõd
